Utah statutes.
53A-17a-131.9.   Agencies coming together for children and youth at risk.
(1)  Money appropriated to or received by the State Board of Education to
maintain Title 63M, Chapter 9, Families, Agencies, and Communities Together
for Children and Youth At Risk Act, shall be subject to the provisions of this
section.
(2)  Participation in the at risk programs funded under this section shall
require consent from a parent or legal guardian for the participant to receive
initial or continuing services under the program.
(3)  A participant's parent or legal guardian shall be actively involved in
the program and all applicable state and federal laws and regulations shall be
observed by the entities and individuals providing the services.
(4)  The board shall use the appropriation to experiment on a community full-
service delivery system level to provide data on the merits of moving the
concept to a fully implemented statewide system.
